Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-3,166
Law enforcement officers; arrest
violators; violations; penalty; payment of taxes and fees.

It
shall be the duty of all law enforcement officers to arrest all violators
of any of the provisions of sections 60-373, 60-374, 60-375, 60-376, 60-378,
60-379, and 60-3,114 to 60-3,116. Any person, firm, or corporation, including
any motor vehicle, trailer, or boat dealer or manufacturer, who fails to comply
with such provisions shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor and, in addition
thereto, shall pay the county treasurer any and all motor vehicle taxes and
fees imposed in sections 60-3,185 and 60-3,190, registration fees, or certification
fees due had the motor vehicle or trailer been properly registered or certified
according to law.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 166;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 88.